Utah statutes.
41-1a-1221.   Fees to cover the cost of electronic payments.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Electronic payment" means use of any form of payment processed through electronic means, including credit cards, debit cards, and automatic clearinghouse transactions.

(b)  "Electronic payment fee" means the fee assessed to defray:

(i)  the charge, discount fee, or processing fee charged by credit card companies or processing agents to process an electronic payment; or

(ii)  costs associated with the purchase of equipment necessary for processing electronic payments.

(2) (a)  The Motor Vehicle Division may collect an electronic payment fee on all registrations and renewals of registration under Subsections 41-1a-1206(1)(a), (1)(b), and (2).

(b)  The fee described in Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  shall be imposed regardless of the method of payment for a particular transaction; and

(ii)  need not be separately identified from the fees imposed for registration and renewals of registration under Subsections 41-1a-1206(1)(a), (1)(b), and (2).

(3)  The division shall establish the fee according to the procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.

(4)  A fee imposed under this section:

(a)  shall be used by the division as a dedicated credit to cover the costs of electronic payments; and

(b)  is not subject to Subsection 63J-2-202(2).

